California statutes. Insurance Code
(1) By force or threat of force, willfully injure, intimidate, interfere with, oppress, or threaten any other person in the free exercise or enjoyment of any right or privilege secured to him or her by the Constitution or laws of this state or
 by the Constitution or laws of the United States because of the other person’s race, color, religion, ancestry, national origin, disability, gender, gender identity, gender expression, or sexual orientation, or because he or she perceives that the other person has one or more of those characteristics. However, the foregoing offense does not include speech alone, except upon a showing that the speech itself threatened violence against a specific person or group of persons and that the defendant had the apparent ability to carry out the threat.

(2) Knowingly deface, damage, or destroy the real or personal property of any other person for the purpose of intimidating or interfering with the free exercise or enjoyment of any right or privilege secured to the other person by the Constitution or laws of this state or by the Constitution or laws of the United States, because of the other person’s race, color, religion, ancestry, national origin,
 disability, gender, gender identity, gender expression, or sexual orientation, or because he or she perceives that the other person has one or more of those characteristics.

(d) As it relates to this section, if determined by a law enforcement agency, “anti-reproductive-rights crime” shall have the meaning set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 13776 of the Penal Code, and shall also include a violation of subdivision (e) of Section 423.2 of the Penal Code, if the crime results in a covered loss under a policy subject to this section.

(e) Upon cancellation of or refusal to renew a policy subject to this section after an insured has submitted a claim to the insurer that is the result of a hate crime committed against the person or property of the insured, or an anti-reproductive-rights crime, the insurer shall report the cancellation or nonrenewal to the commissioner.

(f) A violation of this section shall be an unfair practice subject to Article 6.5 (commencing with Section 790) of Chapter 1 of Division 2.

(g) Nothing in this section shall prevent an insurer subject to this section from taking any of the actions set forth in subdivision (b) on the basis of criteria not otherwise made invalid by this section or any other act, regulation, or law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 719, Sec. 25.   (AB 887)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

677.

(a) All notices of cancellation shall be in writing, mailed to the named insured at the address shown in the policy, or to the insured’s last known address, and shall state, with respect to policies in effect after the time limits specified in Section 676, all of the following:

(1) Which of the grounds set forth in Section 676 is relied upon.

(2) In accordance with the requirements of subdivisions (a) and (e) of Section 791.10, the specific information supporting the cancellation, the specific items of personal and privileged information that support those reasons, if applicable, and corresponding
 summary of rights.

(3) On or after July 1, 2020, a notification that if the policyholder believes the policy has been wrongfully canceled, the policyholder may have the matter reviewed by the department. The notification shall include the department’s internet website, www.insurance.ca.gov, the department’s telephone number, 1-800-927-HELP (4357), and the mailing address of the department’s Consumer Services Division, 300 South Spring Street, Los Angeles, CA 90013.

(b) For purposes of this section, a lienholder’s copy of
 those notices shall be deemed mailed if, with the lienholder’s consent, it is delivered by electronic transmittal, facsimile, or personal delivery.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 201, Sec. 1.   (AB 1813)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

677.2.

(a) This section applies only to policies covered by Section 675.5.

(b) A notice of cancellation shall be in writing and shall be delivered or mailed to the producer of record, provided that the producer of record is not an employee of the insurer, and to the named insured at the mailing address shown on the policy. The time periods and procedures in subdivision (a) of Section 1013 of the Code of Civil Procedure shall be
 applicable if the notice is mailed.

The notice of cancellation shall include the effective date of the cancellation and the reasons for the cancellation.

(c) The notice of cancellation shall be given at least 30 days prior to the effective date of the cancellation, except that in the case of cancellation for nonpayment of premiums or for fraud the notice shall be given no less than 10 days prior to the effective date of the cancellation. Notice of a proposed cancellation pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 676.2 given prior to a finding of the commissioner shall satisfy the requirements of this section if it is given no less than 30 days prior to the effective date of the cancellation and if it states that cancellation will be effective only upon the approval of the commissioner.

(d) This section applies only to cancellations pursuant to Section 676.2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 424, Sec. 6.   (SB 1242)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

677.4.

A notice of cancellation with respect to a policy covered under Section 675 shall be delivered at least 20 calendar days prior to the effective date of the cancellation, except that in the case of a cancellation for nonpayment of premiums, or for fraud, the notice shall be given at least 10 calendar days prior to the effective date of the cancellation. The time periods and procedures in subdivision (a) of Section 1013 of the Code of Civil Procedure
 shall be applicable if the notice is mailed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 424, Sec. 7.   (SB 1242)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

678.

(a) (1) At least 45 days before the policy expiration, an insurer shall deliver to the named insured or mail to the named insured at the address shown in the policy, either of the following:

(A) An offer of renewal of the policy contingent upon payment of premium as stated in the offer, stating each of the following:

(i) Any reduction of limits or elimination of coverage. That reduction of limits or elimination of coverage shall identify the specific limits being reduced or coverage being eliminated by the offer of renewal. The elimination of coverage for the previously covered peril of fire shall be subject to
 subdivision (b) of Section 10103.6.

(ii) The telephone number of the insurer’s representatives who handle consumer inquiries or complaints. The telephone number shall be displayed prominently in a font size consistent with the other text of the renewal offer.

(B) A notice of nonrenewal of the policy. That notice shall contain all of the following:

(i) The specific reason or reasons for the nonrenewal.

(ii) The telephone number of the insurer’s representatives who handle consumer inquiries or complaints. The telephone number shall be displayed prominently in a font size consistent with the other text of the notice of nonrenewal.

(iii) Until July 1, 2020, a brief statement indicating that if the consumer has contacted the insurer to discuss the nonrenewal and remains unsatisfied, the consumer may have the matter reviewed by the department. The statement shall include the telephone number of the unit within the department that responds to consumer inquiries and complaints.

(iv) On or after July 1, 2020, a statement that if the consumer has contacted the insurer to discuss the nonrenewal and remains unsatisfied, the consumer may have the matter reviewed by the department. The statement shall include the department’s internet website, www.insurance.ca.gov, the department’s telephone number, (800) 927-HELP (4357), and the mailing address of the department’s Consumer Services Division, 300 S. Spring Street, Los
 Angeles, CA 90013.

(2) On and after July 1, 2022, the time periods and procedures in subdivision (a) of Section 1013 of the Code of Civil Procedure shall be applicable if an offer or notice is mailed.

(b) If an insurer fails to give the named insured either an offer of renewal or notice of nonrenewal as required by this section, the existing policy, with no change in its terms and conditions, shall remain in effect for 45 days from the date that either the offer to renew or the notice of nonrenewal is delivered or mailed to the named insured. A notice to this effect shall be provided by the insurer to the named insured with the policy or the notice of renewal or nonrenewal.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), with
 respect to a notice of nonrenewal for a policy that expires on or after July 1, 2020, the following timelines apply:

(1) At least 75 days before the policy expiration, the insurer shall deliver the notice of nonrenewal to the named insured or mail the notice of nonrenewal to the named insured at the address shown in the policy. The notice shall include the information contained in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a). On and after July 1, 2022, the time periods and procedures in subdivision (a) of Section 1013 of the Code of Civil Procedure shall be applicable if a notice is mailed.

(2) If an insurer fails to give the named insured a notice of nonrenewal at least 75 days before the policy expiration, as required by paragraph (1), the existing policy, with no
 change in its terms and conditions, shall remain in effect for 75 days from the date that the notice of nonrenewal is delivered or mailed to the named insured. A notice to this effect shall be provided by the insurer to the named insured with the notice of nonrenewal.

(d) A policy written for a term of less than one year shall be considered as if written for a term of one year. A policy written for a term longer than one year, or a policy with no fixed expiration date, shall be considered as if written for successive policy periods or terms of one year.

(e) A notice of nonrenewal for a residential property insurance policy expiring on or after July 1, 2021, shall be accompanied by the following notice:
The
 California Department of Insurance has developed the California Home Insurance Finder, an online tool that can assist you in obtaining insurance for your home. The Finder contains names, addresses, telephone numbers, and internet website links of licensed insurance agents, brokers, and insurance companies that may be able to sell insurance to you. The Finder is organized by ZIP Code and the languages in which the agent, broker, or insurance company sells insurance.

The California FAIR Plan (FAIR Plan) provides basic property insurance as the “insurer of last resort” if you cannot find insurance coverage for your property in the normal (voluntary) insurance market. The FAIR Plan provides basic property insurance coverage for residential structures, as well as personal property coverage for residential and business occupancies. However, FAIR Plan policies may
 not cover liability, theft, or water damage, among other things. There are also optional coverages available for both residential properties. Applications can be made directly with the FAIR Plan (cfpnet.com), although the FAIR Plan strongly encourages use of a licensed agent or broker for assistance in preparing and obtaining a quote. There is no additional cost for using an agent or broker for purchasing a FAIR Plan policy.

California law requires an agent or broker to assist a person seeking a FAIR Plan policy by (1) submitting a coverage application to the FAIR Plan on behalf of the consumer, (2) providing the consumer the FAIR Plan’s internet website address and toll-free telephone number, or (3) obtaining a policy for the consumer through an admitted or nonadmitted insurer.

To supplement a FAIR Plan policy, a
 Difference in Conditions (DIC) policy should be considered. A DIC policy is sold by some private insurers, and provides coverage for things not covered by the basic property insurance policy provided by the FAIR Plan. A consumer who wants broader coverage than that provided by the FAIR Plan policy should contact an agent, broker, or insurance company that offers a DIC policy to obtain this additional coverage. The Department of Insurance maintains a list of insurance companies that sell DIC policies on its internet website (insurance.ca.gov). Additional assistance may be obtained by contacting an agent or broker listed with the department’s online agent locator.

(f) An insurer may use a notice substantially similar to the notice set forth in subdivision (e) to the extent that the notice provides additional or more detailed
 information.

(g) This section applies only to policies of insurance specified in Section 675.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 424, Sec. 8.   (SB 1242)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

678.1.

(a) This section applies only to policies of insurance of commercial insurance that are subject to Sections 675.5 and 676.6.

(b) A notice of nonrenewal shall be in writing and shall be delivered or mailed to the producer of record and to the named insured at the mailing address shown on the policy. The time periods and procedures in subdivision (a) of Section 1013 of the Code of Civil Procedure shall be applicable if the notice is mailed.

(c) An insurer, at least 60 days, but not more than 120 days, in advance of the end of the policy period, shall give notice of nonrenewal, and the reasons for the nonrenewal, if the insurer
 intends not to renew the policy, or to condition renewal upon reduction of limits, elimination of coverages, increase in deductibles, or increase of more than 25 percent in the rate upon which the premium is based.

(d) If an insurer fails to give timely notice required by subdivision (c), the policy of insurance shall be continued, with no change in its terms or conditions, for a period of 60 days after the insurer gives the notice.

(e) With respect to policies defined in subdivision (b) of Section 676.6, in addition to the bases for conditional renewal set forth in subdivision (c), an insurer may also condition renewal upon requirements relating to the underlying policy or policies. If the requirements are not satisfied as of (1) the expiration date of the policy, or
 (2) 30 days after mailing or delivery of such notice, whichever is later, the conditional renewal notice shall be treated as an effective notice of nonrenewal, provided the insurer has sent written confirmation to the first named insured and the producer of record that the conditions were not met and that coverage ceased at the expiration date shown in the expiring policy.

(f) A notice of nonrenewal shall not be required in any of the following situations.

(1) The transfer of, or renewal of, a policy without a change in its terms or conditions or the rate on which the premium is based between insurers that are members of the same insurance group.

(2) The policy has been extended for 90 days or less, if the notice
 required in subdivision (c) has been given prior to the extension.

(3) The named insured has obtained replacement coverage or has agreed, in writing, within 60 days of the termination of the policy, to obtain that coverage.

(4) The policy is for a period of no more than 60 days and the insured is notified at the time of issuance that it may not be renewed.

(5) The named insured requests a change in the terms or conditions or risks covered by the policy within 60 days prior to the end of the policy period.

(6) The insurer has made a written offer to the insured, within the time period specified in subdivision (c), to renew the policy under changed terms or
 conditions or at a changed premium rate. As used herein, “terms or conditions” includes, but is not limited to, a reduction in limits, elimination of coverages, or an increase in deductibles.

(g) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2019.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 424, Sec. 9.   (SB 1242)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

678.2.

The provisions of subdivisions (c) and (e) of Section 678.1 which prohibit notice of nonrenewal earlier than 120 days in advance of the end of the policy period shall not apply to professional liability policies issued to health care providers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 103, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

678.5.

No policy specified in Section 675 that is issued, amended, or renewed on or after January 1, 1990, may be canceled, and an insurer may not refuse to renew such a policy solely on the grounds of corrosive soil conditions if the policy or renewal policy contains an existing exclusion for payment of loss for that peril.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1073, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

679.

There shall be no liability on the part of, and no cause of action of any nature shall arise against, any insurer or its authorized representatives, agents, or employees, or any licensed insurance agent or broker, for any statement made, unless shown to have been made in bad faith with malice in fact, by any of them in (a) any written notice of cancellation or in any other oral or written communication specifying the reasons for cancellation, (b) any communication providing information pertaining to such cancellation, or (c) evidence submitted at any court proceeding or informal inquiry in which such cancellation is an issue.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 313.)
-------------------------------------------

679.5.

Proof of mailing of a notice of cancellation and the reasons therefor or of intention not to renew to the named insured at the address shown in the policy shall be sufficient proof of the notice required by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 313.)
-------------------------------------------

679.6.

The commissioner may, after hearing, exempt from the provisions of this chapter insurance in respect to any risk or class of risk that is eligible under Section 1763 for placement with nonadmitted insurers by and through licensed surplus line brokers upon a finding by him that application of this chapter would diminish or tend to diminish the availability, or substantially increase the cost, of such insurance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 989.)
-------------------------------------------

679.7.

(a) Upon receiving a written request from an insured or the agent or broker of record where authorized by the insured, an insurer shall provide a premium and loss history report to the requesting party for the account’s tenure or the three-year period ending with the inception of the current policy period, whichever is shorter, plus loss experience during the current policy period that is in force if any of the following occur:

(1) The policy is canceled or nonrenewed.

(2) The policyholder requests the information within 60 days prior to the renewal date of an existing policy.

(3) The policyholder’s current insurer’s rating is downrated by a nationally recognized insurance rating service to a financial rating below secure or good or to a rating that would negatively impact the ability of the policyholder to conduct its business operations.

(4) The policyholder’s current insurer is conserved by the department under Section 1011, or is ordered to cease writing business under Sections 1065.1 and 1065.2.

The premium and loss history report, and the loss experience information for the current policy period, shall be provided within 10 business days of receiving the request.

(b) This section applies only to policies of commercial insurance that are subject to Sections 675.5 and 676.6, except for professional liability insurance.

(c) This section shall not apply to a policyholder who, through automated or other means, is provided direct, ongoing access to claims information by the insurer.

(d) For purposes of this section, a loss history report includes, but is not limited to, a list of individual claims detailed by date of claim and total incurred and paid losses.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 102, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 11.5. Disclosure Requirements for Certain Property Insurance [679.9. - 679.9.]

679.9.

If an insurer changes the annual premium under a policy specified in Section 675, it shall, within 15 business days of a request by the insured, inform the insured in writing of each of the following:

(a) The amount of the premium increase or decrease in comparison to the premium charged in the previous year.

(b) The reason or reasons for the change, including, but not limited to, the deletion of a loss-free credit, the application of a claim-related surcharge, or any other reason related to a claim or policyholder inquiry.

(c) A brief statement indicating each of the following:

(1) That the consumer may contact their agent or the insurer with any additional questions regarding the premium and providing the telephone number for the insurer’s representatives who are capable of responding, and authorized to respond, to consumer inquiries and complaints.

(2) That if the insured has contacted the insurer to discuss a premium increase and the insured remains unsatisfied, he or she may contact the department with any inquiries or complaints. The statement shall include the telephone number of the unit within the department that responds to consumer inquiries and complaints.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 571, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.   Operative March 1, 2004, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 571.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 12. Prohibition of Discriminatory Practices by Certain Admitted Insurers [679.70. - 679.75.]

679.70.

This chapter shall apply to policies of insurance, other than automobile insurance and workers’ compensation insurance, on risks located or resident in this state which are issued and take effect or which are renewed after the effective date of this chapter and which insure any of the following contingencies:

(a) Loss of or damage to real property which is used predominantly for residential purposes.

(b) Loss of or damage to personal property in which natural persons resident in specifically described real property of the kind described in subdivision (a) have an insurable interest.

(c) Legal liability of a natural person or persons for loss of, damage to, or injury to, persons or property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 231, Sec. 5.   (AB 2045)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

679.71.

No admitted insurer that is licensed to issue any policy of insurance covered by this chapter shall fail or refuse to accept an application for, or to issue a policy to an applicant for, that insurance (unless the insurance is to be issued to the applicant by another insurer under the same management and control), or cancel that insurance, under conditions less favorable to the insured than in other comparable cases, except for reasons applicable alike to persons of every characteristic listed or defined in subdivision (b) or (e) of Section 51 of the Civil Code; nor shall any of those characteristics, of itself, constitute a condition or risk for which a higher rate, premium, or charge may be required of the insured for that insurance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 682, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

679.72.

No application for insurance specified in this chapter or insurance investigation report furnished by an insurer to its agents or employees for use in determining the insurability of an applicant shall carry any identification, or any requirement therefor, of any characteristic listed or defined in subdivision (b) or (e) of Section 51 of the Civil Code with respect to the applicant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 682, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

679.73.

Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit use in an application for insurance specified in this chapter of a question asking for the birthplace of an applicant if such question is used only to identify the applicant and not to discriminate against the applicant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 772.)
-------------------------------------------

679.74.

(a) An admitted insurer that is licensed to issue a policy of insurance upon real property of the type described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 675 or paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 675.5, when that real property is used for residential purposes, or property of the type described in subdivision (a) of Section 10087, shall not fail or refuse to accept an application for, or to issue a policy to an applicant for, that insurance unless the insurance is to be issued to the applicant by another insurer under the same management and control, or cancel
 that insurance, based upon the following characteristics:

(1) The level or source of income of an individual or group of individuals residing or intending to reside upon the property to be insured, if the individual or group of individuals is not the owner of the real property.

(2) The receipt of assistance, intended for housing, from the federal or state government, or from a local public entity, as defined in Section 50079 of the Health and Safety Code, including, but not limited to, federal vouchers issued under Section 8 of the United States Housing Act of 1937 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1437f), by an individual or group of individuals residing or intending to reside upon the property insured or to be insured.

(b) An application for a policy of insurance upon real property of the type described in subdivision (a), or an insurance investigation report furnished by an insurer to its agents or employees for use in determining the insurability of an applicant under such a policy, shall not carry any identification, or any requirement for identification, of the following characteristics:

(1) The level or source of income of an individual or group of individuals residing or intending to reside upon the property to be insured, if the individual or group of individuals is not the owner of the real property.

(2) The receipt of assistance, intended for
 housing, from the federal or state government, or from a local public entity, as defined in Section 50079 of the Health and Safety Code, including, but not limited to, federal vouchers issued under Section 8 of the United States Housing Act of 1937 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1437f), by an individual or group of individuals residing or intending to reside upon the property insured or to be insured.

(c) In the case of real property of the type described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 675, paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 675.5, or subdivision (a) of Section 10087 that is used for both residential and commercial purposes, the insurer, or its agent or employee, may consider the source of income of a nonresidential tenant of the property in determining the insurability of an applicant.

(d) Nothing in this section prohibits an insurer from failing or refusing to accept an application for, issuing, or canceling or failing to renew, a policy of insurance covered by this chapter as a result of underwriting or assessment of factors other than those characteristics listed in subdivision (a), or as otherwise prohibited by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 432, Sec. 1.   (AB 447)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

679.75.

To reduce underwriting risk and ensure solvency, an insurer providing insurance coverage pertaining to a private detention facility, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 9500 of the Penal Code, may consider whether the private detention facility complies with all of the requirements of Section 9506 of the Penal Code as part of the insurer’s loss control program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 298, Sec. 1.   (SB 334)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. THE BUSINESS OF INSURANCE [680. - 1879.8.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Regulations [680. - 1113.]



  ARTICLE 1. Charter Requirements [680. - 680.]

680.

An insurer shall not transact any class of insurance which is not authorized by its charter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.5. Retaliation [685. - 685.5.]

685.

(a) When by or pursuant to the laws of any other state or foreign country any taxes, licenses and other fees, in the aggregate, and any fines, penalties, deposit requirements or other material obligations, prohibitions or restrictions are or would be imposed upon California insurers, or upon the agents or representatives of those insurers, that are in excess of the taxes, licenses and other fees, in the aggregate, or that are in excess of the fines, penalties, deposit requirements or other obligations, prohibitions, or restrictions directly imposed upon similar insurers, or upon the agents or representatives of those insurers, of that other state or country under the statutes of this state, so long as the laws of the other state or country continue in force or are so applied, the same taxes, licenses and other fees, in the aggregate, or fines, penalties, deposit requirements or other material obligations, prohibitions, or restrictions, of whatever kind, shall be imposed upon the insurers, or upon the agents or representatives of those insurers, of the other state or country doing business or seeking to do business in California. Any tax, license or other fee or other obligation imposed by any city, county, or other political subdivision or agency of the other state or country on California insurers or their agents or representatives shall be deemed to be imposed by that state or country within the meaning of this article.

(b) On and after January 1, 1994, and before January 1, 1995, every insurer whose annual taxes exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) shall make payment by electronic funds transfer. On and after January 1, 1995, every insurer whose annual taxes exceed twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) shall make payment by electronic funds transfer. The insurer shall choose one of the acceptable methods described in Section 45 for completing the electronic funds transfer.

(c) Payment is deemed complete on the date the electronic funds transfer is initiated, if settlement to the state’s demand account occurs on or before the banking day following the date the transfer is initiated. If settlement to the state’s demand account does not occur on or before the banking day following the date the transfer is initiated, payment is deemed to occur on the date settlement occurs.

(d) (1) Any insurer required to remit taxes by electronic funds transfer pursuant to this section who remits those taxes by means other than an appropriate electronic funds transfer, shall be assessed a penalty in an amount equal to 10 percent of the taxes due at the time of the payment.

(2) If the department finds that an insurer’s failure to make payment by an appropriate electronic funds transfer in accordance with subdivision (b) is due to reasonable cause or circumstances beyond the insurer’s control, and occurred notwithstanding the exercise of ordinary care and in the absence of willful neglect, that insurer shall be relieved of the penalty provided in paragraph (1).

(3) Any insurer seeking to be relieved of the penalty provided in paragraph (1) shall file with the department a statement under penalty of perjury setting forth the facts upon which the claim for relief is based.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 721, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

685.1.

This article shall not apply as to personal income taxes, nor as to ad valorem taxes on real or personal property nor as to special purpose obligations or assessments heretofore imposed by another state or foreign country in connection with particular kinds of insurance, other than property insurance; except that deductions, from premium taxes or other taxes otherwise payable, allowed on account of real estate or personal property taxes paid shall be taken into consideration in determining the propriety and extent of retaliatory action under this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 2120.)
-------------------------------------------

685.2.

For the purposes of this article the domicile of an alien insurer, other than insurers formed under the laws of Canada, shall be that state in which is located its principal place of business in the United States.

In the case of an insurer formed under the laws of Canada or a province thereof, its domicile shall be deemed to be that province in which its head office is situated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 2120.)
-------------------------------------------

685.3.

To the extent permitted by the California Constitution there is hereby imposed upon the commissioner the duty to enforce Section 685. It shall be the duty of the commissioner to initiate the enforcement and execution of Section 685 in respect to all matters which by the California Constitution or laws of this state require further or final action by other officials of this state. In respect to any matter initiated by the commissioner, it shall be the duty of the Board of Equalization and the Controller to complete the enforcement and execution of Section 685 in respect to that matter within the scope of the duties and powers of each as set forth in the California Constitution and laws of this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 320, Sec. 29.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

685.4.

The provisions of this article shall also be applicable to reciprocals or interinsurance exchanges and fraternal benefit societies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 2120.)
-------------------------------------------

685.5.

The reduction in the gross premiums tax rate made by Section 12202.2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code shall not be considered in any determination by the Insurance Commissioner to impose or enforce a tax under the retaliatory tax provisions of Sections 685 to 685.4, inclusive, and reported pursuant to Sections 12281, 12287, 12288, and 12289 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, 2nd Ex. Sess., Ch. 2, Sec. 2.   (SB 2 2x)   Effective June 9, 2016.   Operative on July 1, 2016, or later date, as prescribed by Sec. 6 of Ch. 2.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed by Secs. 7 and 8 of Ch. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.7. Continuity of Management [688. - 688.5.]

688.

The Legislature declares that it is desirable for the general welfare and in particular for the welfare of insurance beneficiaries, policyholders, injured claimants and others that the business of domestic insurers be continued notwithstanding the event of a national emergency.

The specific purpose of this chapter is to facilitate the continued operation of domestic insurers in the event that a national emergency is caused by an attack on the United States or by a nuclear, atomic or other disaster which makes it impossible or impracticable for a company to conduct its business in strict accord with applicable provisions of law, its bylaws, or its charter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1285.)
-------------------------------------------

688.1.

The board of directors of any domestic insurer may at any time adopt emergency bylaws, subject to repeal or change by action of those having power to adopt regular bylaws for the insurer, which shall be operative during such a national emergency and which may, notwithstanding any different provisions of the regular bylaws, or of the applicable statutes, or of the insurer’s charter, make any provision that may be reasonably necessary for the operation of the insurer during the period of such emergency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1285.)
-------------------------------------------

688.2.

In the event that the board of directors of a domestic insurer has not adopted emergency bylaws, the following provisions shall become effective upon the occurrence of such a national emergency:

(1) Three directors shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business at all meetings of the board.

(2) Any vacancy in the board may be filled by a majority of the remaining directors, though less than a quorum, or by a sole remaining director.

(3) If there are no surviving directors, but at least three vice presidents of the company survive, the three vice presidents with the longest term of service shall be the directors and shall possess all of the powers of the previous board of directors and such powers as are granted herein or by subsequently enacted legislation. By majority vote such emergency board of directors may elect other directors. If there are not at least three surviving vice presidents, the commissioner or duly designated person exercising the powers of the commissioner shall appoint three persons as directors who shall possess all of the powers of the previous board of directors and such powers as are granted herein or by subsequently enacted legislation, and these persons by majority vote may elect other directors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1285.)
-------------------------------------------

688.3.

At any time the board of directors of a domestic insurer may, by resolution, provide that in the event of such a national emergency and in the event of the death or incapacity of the president, the secretary or the treasurer of the company such officers, or any of them, shall be succeeded in the office by the person named or described in a succession list adopted by the board of directors. Such list may be on the basis of named persons or position titles, shall establish the order of priority and may prescribe the conditions under which the powers of the office shall be exercised.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1285.)
-------------------------------------------

688.4.

At any time the board of directors of a domestic insurer may, by resolution, provide that in the event of such a national emergency the home office or principal place of business of the insurer shall be at such location as is named or described in the resolution. Such resolution may provide for alternate locations and establish an order of preference.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1285.)
-------------------------------------------

688.5.

“Insurer” as used in this article includes insurance corporations and insurer organizations of every type and reciprocal or interinsurance exchanges and the incorporated attorney in fact of a reciprocal or interinsurance exchange, which corporate attorney in fact is either organized under the laws of or has its home office and principal place of business in this State.

“Board of directors” as used in this article includes the policy-determining body of an insurer whether or not it is called by that name.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1285.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Capital Structure [690. - 690.]

690.
